Mississippi, session 2026, SB2645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings ascribed in this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Hemp beverage" means a liquid capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being that consists of or contains any part of the hemp plant, including naturally occurring cannabinoids, compounds, concentrates, extracts, isolates, or resins. (b)  "Kratom beverage" means a liquid capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being that consists of or contains kratom leaf or kratom leaf extract that does not contain any synthesized kratom alkaloids, other kratom constituents, or synthesized metabolites of any kratom constituent. (c)  "Prohibited beverage" means a hemp beverage, a THC beverage, or a kratom beverage. (d) "Restaurant" has the meaning ascribed in Section 75-97-1. (e)  "Retail food establishment" has the meaning ascribed in Section 69-1-18. (f)  "THC beverage" means a liquid capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being that consists of or contains delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol, artificially derived cannabinoids, as defined in Section 41-137-3, hexahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinol acetate, tetrahydrocannabiphorol or tetrahydrocannabivarin. (2)  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, hold for sale, offer for sale or distribute any prohibited beverage in this state. (b)  Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three (3) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. (3)  (a)  A retail food establishment that sells or distributes a prohibited beverage in violation of this section shall be subject to disciplinary action under Section 69-1-18. (b)  The license of a retail food establishment may be suspended or revoked if found by the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce to be in violation of this section, as provided in Section 69-1-18. (4)  (a)  A restaurant that sells or distributes a prohibited beverage in violation of this section shall be subject to all enforcement measures as provided by rule or regulation of the State Department of Health. (b)  The permit of a restaurant may be suspended or revoked as provided by rule or regulation of the State Department of Health upon conviction of an owner or an employee of the establishment for a violation of this section in connection with the establishment. (5)  The Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the State Department of Health may adopt rules or regulations as necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  Section 75-103-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-103-3.  (1)  (a)  A retailer, manufacturer, and/or wholesaler shall not distribute or sell a kratom product to an individual under twenty-one (21) years of age. (b)  Kratom products offered for sale must be placed behind the retailer's counter. (c)  Every person engaged in the business of selling kratom products at retail shall notify each individual employed by that person as a retail sales clerk that state law: (i)  Prohibits the sale or distribution of kratom products, including samples, to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age and the purchase or receipt of kratom products by any person under twenty-one (21) years of age; and (ii)  Requires that proof of age be demanded from a prospective purchaser or recipient if the individual is not known to the seller, barterer, deliverer or giver of the kratom product to be the age of twenty-one (21) years or older.  Every person employed by a person engaged in the business of selling kratom products at retail shall sign an agreement with his employer in substantially the following or similar form: "I understand that state law prohibits the sale or      distribution of kratom products to persons under the age of      twenty-one (21) years, and requires that proof of age be    demanded from a prospective purchaser or recipient if the individual is not known to the seller, barterer, deliverer      or giver of the kratom product to be the age of twenty-one      (21) years or older.  I promise, as a condition of my     employment, to observe this law." (d)  No retailer who instructs his employee as provided in this section shall be liable for any violations committed by such employees. (2)  A retailer, wholesaler, jobber, distributor and manufacturer shall not prepare, distribute, or sell any of the following: (a)  A product represented as being a kratom product that does not meet the definition for a kratom product pursuant to Section 75-103-1; (b)  A kratom product containing a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater than one percent (1%) of the alkaloid composition and not to exceed one-half (0.5) milligram per container of the product; (c)  A kratom product containing any controlled substance listed in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, unless the product is compounded by a licensed pharmacist with the controlled substance dispensed in accordance with a valid prescription; or (d)  Any kratom product that does not have a label that clearly sets forth the identity, address and telephone number of the manufacturer, and a full list of the ingredients in the kratom product. (3)  A retailer, wholesaler, jobber, distributor or manufacturer shall not sell, distribute or expose for sale a kratom product prior to registering with the Mississippi Department of Revenue. (4)  A retailer, wholesaler, jobber, distributor or manufacturer shall comply with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section from and after October 1, 2025. (5)  Nothing in this section shall permit the sale of kratom beverages prohibited by Section 1 of this act. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.